Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
ARTICLE 9
CHALLENGES

Editor's note:

Articles 1 to 13 were repealed and reenacted in 1980. This article was numbered as article 16 of chapter 49, C.R.S. 1963. For additional historical information concerning the repeal and reenactment of articles 1 to 13 of this title in 1980, see the editor's note immediately following the title heading for this title. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated in 1980.

Section

PART 1 CHALLENGES TO REGISTRATION

PART 2 CHALLENGES TO VOTING

PART 3 PROVISIONAL BALLOTS